Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.121

Designated brokers—Registration—Endorsements.

(1) A designated broker must hold a license as a managing broker in accordance with RCW 18.85.111, and may act as a designated broker for more than one firm. The department shall register designated brokers.

(2) A managing broker for a firm must be registered to that firm as its designated broker if that managing broker accepts endorsements from other firms as their designated broker.

(3) Registered designated brokers must immediately notify the department of additional firms for which they serve as designated broker, and shall receive a printed endorsement on their managing broker's licenses indicating the names of all firms for which they serve as designated broker.

[ 2008 c 23 s 13.]